Nevada, session 83, SB64.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 422 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. Except to the extent required by federal law, upon the
death of a designated beneficiary of a savings trust account
established under the Nevada ABLE Savings Program pursuant to
NRS 427A.889, the Department or any other officer or agency of
the State Government shall not:
(a) Seek recovery under NRS 422.29302 of any amount
remaining in the savings trust account for any benefits that were
correctly paid under Medicaid after the savings trust account was
established; or
(b) File a claim for payment from the savings trust account
pursuant to 26 U.S.C. § 529A(f).
2. The Director shall:
(a) Apply to the Secretary of Health and Human Services for
any waiver of federal law or apply for any amendment of the State
Plan for Medicaid that is necessary to carry out the provisions of
subsection 1.
(b) Fully cooperate in good faith with the Federal Government
during the application process to satisfy the requirements of the
-
*SB64*

– 3 –
Federal Government for obtaining a waiver or amendment
pursuant to paragraph (a).
Sec. 2. NRS 422.29301 is hereby amended to read as follows:
422.29301 The Director:
1. Shall administer the provisions of NRS 422.29302,
422.29304 and 422.29306 [;] and section 1 of this act;
2. May adopt such regulations as are necessary for the
administration of those provisions; and
3. May invoke any legal, equitable or special procedures for
the enforcement of those provisions.
Sec. 3. NRS 422.29302 is hereby amended to read as follows:
422.29302 1. Except as otherwise provided in this section
and section 1 of this act and to the extent it is not prohibited by
federal law and when circumstances allow, the Department shall
recover benefits correctly paid for Medicaid from:
(a) The undivided estate of the person who received those
benefits; and
(b) Any recipient of money or property from the undivided
estate of the person who received those benefits.
2. The Department shall not recover benefits pursuant to
subsection 1, except from a person who is neither a surviving spouse
nor a child, until after the death of the surviving spouse, if any, and
only at a time when the person who received the benefits has no
surviving child who is under 21 years of age, blind or disabled.
3. Except as otherwise provided by federal law, if a transfer of
real or personal property by a recipient of Medicaid is made for less
than fair market value, the Department may pursue any remedy
available pursuant to chapter 112 of NRS with respect to the
transfer.
4. The amount of Medicaid paid to or on behalf of a person is a
claim against the estate in any probate proceeding only at a time
when there is no surviving spouse or surviving child who is under
21 years of age, blind or disabled.
5. The Director may elect not to file a claim against the estate
of a recipient of Medicaid or the spouse of the recipient if the
Director determines that the filing of the claim will cause an undue
hardship for the spouse or other survivors of the recipient. The
Director shall adopt regulations defining the circumstances that
constitute an undue hardship.
6. Any recovery of money obtained pursuant to this section
must be applied first to the cost of recovering the money. Any
remaining money must be divided among the Federal Government,
the Department and the county in the proportion that the amount of
assistance each contributed to the recipient bears to the total amount
of the assistance contributed.
-
*SB64*

– 4 –
7. Any recovery by the Department from the undivided estate
of a recipient pursuant to this section must be paid in cash to the
extent of:
(a) The amount of Medicaid paid to or on behalf of the recipient
after October 1, 1993; or
(b) The value of the remaining assets in the undivided estate,
 whichever is less.
Sec. 4. 1. The Department of Health and Human Services
and other officers and agencies of the State Government shall
terminate all efforts for recovery or claims for payment from an
ABLE savings trust account which are prohibited by the provisions
of section 1 of this act.
2. As used in this section, “ABLE savings trust account” means
a savings trust account established under the Nevada ABLE Savings
Program pursuant to NRS 427A.889.
Sec. 5. This act becomes effective upon passage and approval.
H
-
*SB64*